test/src/morphology/N-zeml'a_gt-norm.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup
Tests:
# todo:
# Proofread the gold standard (below)
# Then: run analyser, then correct. 

  Noun - земля M anim : # Noun - full paradigm
      земля+N+Fem+Sg+Nom: земля́
      земля+N+Fem+Sg+Acc: зе́млю
      земля+N+Fem+Sg+Gen: земли́
      земля+N+Fem+Sg+Loc: земле́
      земля+N+Fem+Sg+Dat: земле́
      земля+N+Fem+Sg+Ins: землёй
      земля+N+Fem+Pl+Nom: зе́мли
      земля+N+Fem+Pl+Acc+Inan: зе́мли
      земля+N+Fem+Pl+Gen: зе́мель
      земля+N+Fem+Pl+Loc: зе́млях
      земля+N+Fem+Pl+Dat: зе́млям
      земля+N+Fem+Pl+Ins: зе́млями
